test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-caallid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - čäälliđ: # MLO, checked

    čäälliđ+V+Inf: čäälliđ
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: čalluđ
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalluum
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čalluuh
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čálloo
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čállojeen
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čalluuvettee
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čalluv
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čallup
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čalluuvetteđ
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čállojeh
    
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čállojim
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čállojih
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čallui
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čalluim
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čalluid
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čalluin
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čalluim
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čalluid
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čállojii
    
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: čalluuččim
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: čalluuččih
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: čalluuččij
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: čalluuččáim
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: čalluuččáid
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: čalluuččáin
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: čalluuččijm
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: čalluuččijd
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: čalluuččii
    
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: čalluužeem
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: čalluužeeh
##    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: čalluš
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: čalluužeen
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: čallušvettee
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: čalluužává
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: čalluužep
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: čallušvetteđ
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: čalluužeh
    
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čalluu
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čallum
#    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: čalluužii
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [čallum, čaallum] #Lene added čaallum
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: čallum
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: čalluumin
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: čalluumist
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: čalluumân
    čäälliđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: čalluuhánnáá
